Tennessee statutes. Title 62 Professions, Businesses and Trades
Part 1

General Provisions

62-21-101. Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Tennessee Application of Pesticides Act of 1978.”

Acts 1978, ch. 844, § 1; T.C.A., § 62-2101.

Cross-References. Commercial aerial application of pesticides, title 43, ch. 8, part 3.

Hazardous Chemical Right to Know Law, title 50, ch. 3, part 20.

Insecticides, fungicides and rodenticides, title 43, ch. 8.

Liability of professional societies, title 62, ch. 50, part 1.

Pest control compact, title 43, ch. 6, part 3.

Plant pest act, title 43, ch. 6, part 1.

State examining boards, general provisions, title 4, ch. 19.

62-21-102. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Adjuvant” means any substance that, when added to a pesticide, is intended to aid, modify or enhance its effectiveness by its properties of serving as a wetting agent, detergent, spreading agent, synergist, deposit builder, adhesive, surfactant, emulsifying agent, deflocculating agent, water modifier or similar agent, with or without toxic properties of its own, and when sold in a package or container separate from that of the pesticide with which it is to be used;

“Branch office” means any location other than the principal base of operation from which a pest control firm carries out its pest control activities. The maintenance of personnel and equipment at these locations where pest control activities are carried out constitutes a branch office under this chapter;

“Category” means an area of licensing or certification for which commercial pest control operators or restricted use applicators are qualified;

“Certification” means the authorization by the commissioner to use, supervise the use of, buy or sell restricted use pesticides or to issue a wood destroying insect infestation inspection report;

“Certified applicator” means any individual who is certified by the commissioner as authorized to use, buy, sell or supervise the use of restricted use pesticides;

“Charter” means an instrument issued by the department, authorizing a person, firm or corporation to engage in the business of commercial pest control operations;

“Commercial pest control operator” means a person or business entity who engages in the custom application of pesticides or inspection of real property for the purpose of issuing a wood destroying insect infestation inspection report and who has demonstrated to the satisfaction of the commissioner the person's qualifications to design and direct pest control and inspection operations;

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of agriculture;

“Custom application of pesticides” means the application of pesticides for a fee;

“Department” means the department of agriculture;

“Labeling” means all labels and written, printed or graphic matter accompanying the pesticide or device at any time or to which reference is made on the label and the pesticide must be used consistent with the label;

“Licensee” means any person duly licensed under this chapter;

“Office” means point of headquarters or location of the principal operation of a pest control firm or a point or location where branch offices are supervised;

“Pesticide” means any substance or mixture of substances or chemical intended for defoliating or desiccating plants or for preventing, destroying, repelling or mitigating any insects, rodents, fungi, bacteria, weeds or other forms of plant or animal life the commissioner declares to be a pest. This includes, but is not limited to, insecticides, fungicides, bacteriacides, herbicides, desiccants, defoliants, adjuvants or nematocides;

“Prevention” means the prevention of conditions conducive to termite harborage or activity, or both, by advice of a licensed operator;

“Private applicator” means an individual who uses, supervises the use of or buys any pesticide that is classified for restricted use for purposes of producing an agricultural commodity on property owned or rented by the individual or the individual's employer or if applied without compensation other than trading of personal services between producers of agricultural commodities on the property of another person;

“Recertification” means the reauthorization every three (3) years by the commissioner to use, supervise the use of, buy or sell restricted use pesticides;

“Registration” means an instrument authorizing a person to act as solicitor, salesperson or agent for a chartered pest control business;

“Restricted use applicator” means a person who uses or supervises the use of, sells or buys restricted use pesticides for any use or for use on any property other than as defined under private applicator or commercial pest control operator;

“Restricted use pesticide” means any pesticide, the efficacy data on which indicates it may have adverse effect on people or the environment, or both;

“Termite warranty without initial chemical treatment” means any agreement entered into between a chartered commercial pest control operator and any other person or entity for the purpose of termite prevention or control for any structure or building, regardless of any initial chemical application for prevention or control to the property;

“Under the direct supervision” means any application or sale of a pesticide by a certified applicator acting under the instructions and control of a private applicator, commercial applicator or commercial pest control operator who is available if and when needed, if the applicator or operator is physically present or in direct communication by conventional means of communication; and

“Wood destroying insect infestation inspection report” means a report written by a chartered commercial pest control operator employing a person licensed in the category of wood destroying organisms. The report shall indicate the presence or absence of visible wood destroying insects and the presence or absence of visible damage caused by the insects and shall be issued after an on-site inspection of the property.

Acts 1978, ch. 844, § 2; T.C.A., § 62-2102; Acts 1988, ch. 545, §§ 1-5; 1996, ch. 805, §§ 7, 8; 2000, ch. 668, §§ 1-3; 2001, ch. 105, §§ 1, 2; 2009, ch. 363, § 1; 2011, ch. 87, § 1; 2020, ch. 640, § 1.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment substituted “commissioner” for “pest control licensing and advisory board” in (7).

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 640, § 16. April 1, 2020.

62-21-103. Business charter requirement.

No person shall engage in business as a commercial pest control operator until the person has secured a charter from the department.

Any form of solicitation for pest control business or advertising is forbidden under this chapter unless the person has a charter issued in one (1) or all of the categories established by regulation under this chapter.

The charter may be granted in any one (1) or all of the categories established by regulation under this chapter.

The charter may be issued only if the requirements of this chapter have been met and the stipulated fees have been received by the department.

A charter shall be required for each office and each branch office. The requirements of this chapter do not apply to any class of commercial pest control operators such as, but not limited to, aerial applicators, when that class of commercial pest control operators is the subject of specific laws and regulations relating to that specific class in the commercial application of pesticides.

All chartered companies are required to label the sides of company vehicles with the name of the company and the charter number. The size of the lettering shall not be less than two inches (2") tall.

All chartered persons, companies or corporations shall have a physical address and shall maintain a physical address while the charter is in effect.

Acts 1978, ch. 844, § 3; T.C.A., § 62-2103; Acts 1988, ch. 545, § 6; 2005, ch. 427, § 3; 2018, ch. 636, § 1.

Cross-References. Commercial aerial application of pesticides, title 43, ch. 8, part 3.

62-21-104. Creation of board — Notification of vacancy — Termination due to vacancy.

A seven-member pest control advisory board is created and established. The board shall consist of the commissioner or the commissioner's designated representative, the director of the division of plant industries, a member of the staff of a university of this state, two (2) licensed commercial pest control operators and two (2) Tennessee citizens who are not associated with the pest control industry.

The governor shall appoint the members of the board to serve four-year terms, and, in the event of a vacancy, the governor shall appoint an interim member to fill the unexpired portion of the previous member's term. If the board incurs a vacancy, it shall notify the appointing authority in writing within ninety (90) days after the vacancy occurs and shall provide a list of qualified persons to be appointed to the board and information regarding the qualified persons that is sufficient for the appointing authority to make an informed decision. All vacancies on the board, other than ex officio members, shall be filled by the appointing authority within ninety (90) days of receiving written notice of the vacancy and sufficient information is provided for the appointing authority to make an informed decision in regard to filling the vacancy. If the board has more than one (1) vacancy that is more than one hundred eighty (180) days in duration, the board shall report to the government operations committees of the house of representatives and the senate on why the vacancies have not been filled. If more than one-half (½) of the positions on the board are vacant for more than one hundred eighty (180) consecutive days, the board shall terminate; provided, that the board shall wind up its affairs pursuant to § 4-29-112. The board that is terminated pursuant to this subsection (b) shall be reviewed by the evaluation committees pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled at title 4, chapter 5, before ceasing all its activities. Nothing in this section shall prohibit the general assembly from continuing, restructuring or reestablishing the board. This subsection (b) shall only apply if the governor is authorized to make appointments to at least one-half (½) of the positions on the board.

In making appointments to the board, the governor shall strive to ensure that at least one (1) person serving on the board is sixty (60) years of age or older and that at least one (1) person serving on the board is a member of a racial minority.

With the exception of the commissioner, no proxies nor power to designate a representative to serve in the place of a board member shall be allowed.

The department shall establish by written policy, rule or regulation, provisions relative to conflicts of interest of board members.

Acts 1978, ch. 844, § 4; T.C.A., § 62-2104; Acts 1983, ch. 125, §§ 1, 2; 1988, ch. 545, § 7; 1988, ch. 1013, § 36; 2000, ch. 835, § 3; 2003, ch. 177, § 3; 2020, ch. 640, §§ 2, 3.

Compiler's Notes. The pest control advisory board, created by this section, terminates June 30, 2022. See §§ 4-29-112, 4-29-243.

Acts 2020, ch. 640, § 13 provided that notwithstanding § 4-29-112, the pest control board created by § 62-21-104 is terminated and ceases to exist on April 1, 2020.

Acts 2020, ch. 640, § 15 provided that the members serving on the pest control board on March 31, 2020, may continue to serve on the pest control advisory board until the expiration of the member's term, at the will of the appointing authority.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment inserted “advisory” between “control” and “board” in the first sentence of (a); and deleted “when this board sits as a licensing examining board” following “allowed” in (c).

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 640, § 16. April 1, 2020.

Attorney General Opinions. Validity of appointment to board, OAG 95-051, 1995 Tenn. AG LEXIS 51 (5/15/95).

62-21-105. Board's advice to commissioner.

The board shall advise the commissioner as to the promulgation of rules, categories of licenses, qualifications of applicants, and examinations for licenses.

Acts 1978, ch. 844, § 5; T.C.A., § 62-2105; Acts 2020, ch. 640, § 4.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment rewrote the section which read: “(a) The board has the following powers and duties: “(1) Advise the commissioner as to the promulgation of rules and regulations;“(2) Determine the different categories of service or classes that will require separate charters or licenses, prescribe the required qualifications for applicants for the various licenses and charters and devise or approve the necessary examinations or testing procedures for the examination of applicants; and“(3) Certify the qualifications of applicants to the commissioner requesting issuance of a license.“(b)(1) The board shall meet quarterly for the purpose of examining and certifying applicants for licenses and at any time when requested by the commissioner or by a majority of the board.“(2) The questions and answers of all examinations to determine the qualifications of those seeking to be licensed as commercial pest control operators to engage in the various classes of pest control shall be written, and all such examinations shall be substantially uniform in content, difficulty and equity as to each of the various classes.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 640, § 16. April 1, 2020.

62-21-106. Office and branch office requirements — Employees.

Each person applying for or holding a charter shall have, for each office or branch office, a licensed commercial pest control operator for each category of service offered.

The technical service work of each office or branch office shall be under the direct supervision of the licensed operator.

The technical service work shall be performed by employees who meet the qualifications established by rule.

Each person chartered shall be required to have a commercial pest control operator for the main or supervisory office.

Branch offices must be supervised by licensed operators.

No licensed commercial pest control operator shall be permitted to supervise more than one (1) office or branch office. The commercial pest control operator for each office or branch shall be domiciled and resident at or near the office that the operator supervises and shall report to the office the operator supervises on a regular routine work basis.

Acts 1978, ch. 844, § 6; 1981, ch. 78, § 2; T.C.A., § 62-2106; Acts 1988, ch. 545, § 9; 2020, ch. 640, § 5.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment substituted “established by rule” for “that the board may establish by regulation” in (a)(3).

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 640, § 16. April 1, 2020.

62-21-107. Bond.

Each application for a charter must be accompanied by a corporate surety bond satisfactory to the commissioner and conditioned that the principal named therein shall honestly conduct the business in accordance with the pest control laws of this state and the rules and regulations promulgated under the laws of this state and shall faithfully perform any contracts for pest control work.

Any person having a right of action against the charter operation may bring suit against the principal and sureties of the bond.

The amount of the bond shall be at least ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

Acts 1978, ch. 844, § 7; T.C.A., § 62-2107; Acts 2000, ch. 668, § 4.

62-21-108. Insurance required.

Each application for a charter must be accompanied by evidence that the applicant holds occurrence liability insurance of two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) for a single occurrence of liability and five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) aggregate liability for the annual period of insurance. Applicants filing for charters desiring to conduct work in the wood destroying organisms category shall, in addition to the above occurrence liability insurance, hold errors and omissions insurance of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) for a single occurrence of liability and three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) aggregate errors and omissions liability for the annual period of insurance.

Acts 1978, ch. 844, § 8; T.C.A., § 62-2108; Acts 1988, ch. 545, § 8; 2000, ch. 668, § 5; 2005, ch. 427, § 2.

62-21-109. Registration of solicitors.

A person chartered under this chapter shall list with the department the name, residence and address of each salesperson or agent who is authorized to solicit business or anyone authorized to enter into a pest control contract on behalf of the chartered person. A person listed as a licensee or registered technician is considered to be a registered solicitor for the chartered person without a requirement of separate solicitor registration.

Each person chartered is required to secure from the department a solicitor's registration for any salespersons or agents.

Registration shall be issued when it has been shown that the prospective solicitor or agent is an employee of the chartered firm and has written authority to solicit business for the firm and bind the firm to contracts for pest control service and when the fees provided for in this chapter have been paid and received by the department.

No person registered under this section shall possess more than one (1) registration card at a time and can be gainfully employed by only one (1) chartered person.

It is a violation for a registered solicitor under this chapter knowingly to use false information or a deceptive representation to sell pesticide application services.

Each person registered under this section shall possess commercial certification in each category of service offered for sale or provided.

Acts 1978, ch. 844, § 9; T.C.A., § 62-2109; Acts 1994, ch. 960, § 11.

62-21-110. List of employees.

All persons chartered under this chapter shall be required to list with the department the names, residences and addresses of all employees, exclusive of clerical employees, who are engaged in the handling, transportation or application of pesticide chemicals.

Immediate notification of any changes in employment of these employees shall be forwarded to the department by the chartered person, including any change of address or residence.

Acts 1978, ch. 844, § 10; T.C.A., § 62-2110.

Textbooks. Tennessee Law of Evidence (2nd ed., Cohen, Paine and Sheppeard), § 401.12.

62-21-111. Cost.

The cost for a charter shall be set by rule pursuant to § 43-1-703.

The cost for a license shall be set by rule pursuant to § 43-1-703, applicable for each category in which a license is requested.

The cost for a registration of all nonclerical employees shall be set by rule pursuant to § 43-1-703.

The cost for a consultant's license shall be set by rule pursuant to § 43-1-703.

Acts 1978, ch. 844, § 11; T.C.A., § 62-2111; Acts 1991, ch. 441, § 1; 2015, ch. 485, § 40.

Cross-References. Delinquent fees, § 62-21-121.

Examination fees, § 62-21-112.

Wood destroying organisms, operation fee, § 62-21-114.

62-21-112. Examination of license applicants — Fees.

The cost for an initial examination of a license applicant is established by rule pursuant to § 43-1-703 for each category in which examination is requested.

When a license application has been examined and the applicant fails to meet the qualifications for licensure, the applicant may be examined at a subsequent date in accordance with rules promulgated by the commissioner. Each application for reexamination is accompanied by a reexamination fee established by rule pursuant to § 43-1-703 for each category in which examination is requested.

An applicant shall submit a separate application and reexamination fee each time a reexamination is requested for any category except the category of private pesticide applicator.

Acts 1978, ch. 844, § 12; 1981, ch. 78, § 3; T.C.A., § 62-2112; Acts 1991, ch. 441, §§ 2, 3; 2020, ch. 640, § 6.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment rewrote the section which read: “(a) Each application for initial examination of a license applicant shall be accompanied by an examination fee of one hundred fifty dollars ($150) for each category in which examination is requested.“(b)(1) When a license applicant has been examined by the board and found not qualified, the applicant may be reexamined at a subsequent date in accordance with regulations promulgated by the board. Each application for reexamination shall be accompanied by a reexamination fee of one hundred fifty dollars ($150) for each category in which reexamination is requested.“(2) A separate application and reexamination fee must be filed by an applicant each time a reexamination is requested for any category except the category of private pesticide applicator.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 640, § 16. April 1, 2020.

62-21-113. [Reserved.]

Every chartered person shall enter into a written contract for any service rendered in the category of wood destroying organisms.

A separate contract must be given for each structure or building; provided, that an industrial complex or group of buildings may be covered by a single contract when it is an integral part of one (1) industrial unit.

A garage, pump house or other outbuilding commonly a part of a residential establishment may be covered by the same contract as that covering the residence itself; provided, that the garages, pump houses or other outbuildings are not used as separate residential units.

An apartment complex cannot be construed to be an industrial complex.

No person or business entity may enter into an agreement to provide services for termite prevention, control or a termite warranty without initial treatment unless properly chartered as a commercial pest control operator pursuant to § 62-21-103.

Notwithstanding this chapter or any other law to the contrary, a chartered commercial pest control operator may enter into an agreement to provide ongoing services for a termite warranty without initial treatment for any structure or building regardless of any initial chemical application for prevention or control of termites of any such structure or building.

Any agreement for a termite warranty without initial treatment shall clearly state in one-half inch (½") high letters on the front of the agreement if a damage repair guarantee is not offered. A violation of this subdivision (b)(2)(B) constitutes a violation of the Tennessee Consumer Protection Act, compiled in title 47, chapter 18, part 1.

Prior to entering into a termite warranty without initial treatment agreement with any person or entity under this subsection (b), the chartered commercial pest control operator must conduct an initial inspection and issue an initial report that includes:

A graph or diagram of the property where any visible damage or infestation, if any, is located;

A written description of the type of damage, if any; and

The date of the initial inspection report.

The commissioner shall, subject to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, promulgate all necessary rules and regulations, consistent with this chapter. Rules promulgated to implement this subsection (b) shall regulate the commercial pest control industry and provide for the protection of the consumer.

Acts 1978, ch. 844, § 14; T.C.A., § 62-2114; Acts 1991, ch. 441, § 5; 1994, ch. 960, § 12; 2009, ch. 363, § 2.

62-21-115. Operator or aerial applicator license requirement.

To use, buy or sell a restricted use pesticide, an individual must be certified by the commissioner, hold a valid commercial pest control operator's license or hold an aerial applicator's license under § 43-8-301.

Acts 1978, ch. 844, § 15; T.C.A., § 62-2115.

62-21-116. Use of pesticide consistent with labeling.

No person shall use a pesticide in a manner inconsistent with its labeling.

Acts 1978, ch. 844, § 16; T.C.A., § 62-2116.

62-21-117. Labeling of pesticides.

It is illegal to store or transport any pesticide chemicals unless the containers for the chemicals are labeled to show the:

Name of the pesticide; and

Concentration of the pesticide.

When pesticides are stored or transported in containers other than those in which they were placed by the manufacturer or formulators, the label must also show the name of the chartered person, firm or corporation.

Acts 1978, ch. 844, § 17; T.C.A., § 62-2117.

62-21-118. Powers and duties of commissioner.

The commissioner has the power and duty to:

Administer this chapter;

Promulgate rules and regulations that are consistent with the requirements of the United States environmental protection agency implementing and supplementing this chapter and provide for its orderly administration;

Issue licenses, collect appropriate fees and issue charters upon application and qualification as provided by this chapter;

Determine requirements for and issue certification and recertification for users of restricted use pesticides;

Promulgate rules and regulations concerning handling and usage of pesticides;

Classify pesticides as to whether of general or restricted use;

Hold hearings and deny, revoke, modify or suspend charters, licenses and certification, and/or impose civil penalties of up to one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each violation;

The commissioner or the commissioner's designee may enter any place during normal business hours where pesticides are used or stored for the purposes of inspection, sampling or observation;

Through rule and regulation require the maintenance or filing of records;

Issue subpoenas for persons and records incidental to any hearing; and

Inspect periodically the operation and conduct of a charter holder, licensee or certificate holder.

The commissioner shall promulgate rules and regulations that may be requested by a two-thirds' (2/3) affirmative vote of the legislative body of any municipal or county government within any county having a population of less than two hundred fifty thousand (250,000), according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census, that have as their purpose the regulation of the use of pesticides in their specific area of jurisdiction. These regulations must be reasonable and not in conflict with state or federal law and regulations, but for good cause shown may be more stringent than those standards.

Acts 1978, ch. 844, § 18; T.C.A., § 62-2118; Acts 1988, ch. 545, § 10; 1988, ch. 878, § 6; 1992, ch. 667, § 6; 2020, ch. 640, § 7.

Compiler's Notes. For tables of population of Tennessee municipalities, and for U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment deleted “upon approval by the board” following “Issue licenses” in (a)(3).

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 640, § 16. April 1, 2020.

Attorney General Opinions. The Commissioner of Agriculture has authority to impose penalties at his discretion for any amount up to $1,000 for each violation of title 62, chapter 21 or title 43, chapter 8, parts 1 and 2, and the rules and regulations promulgated under these respective chapters, OAG 00-189, 2000 Tenn. AG LEXIS 193 (12/20/00).

62-21-119. Denial, suspension, modification or revocation of charter, license or certificate — Penalties — Warnings.

If the commissioner has reason to believe that any person has violated this chapter, including its rules, or has used economic poison in violation of the Tennessee Insecticide, Fungicide, and Rodenticide Act, compiled in title 43, chapter 8, parts 1 and 2, including its rules, the commissioner may:

Deny, revoke, suspend, or modify a license, charter, or certification. The denial, suspension, revocation, or modification may be indefinite or for a time certain;

Impose civil penalties of up to one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each violation or issue a warning notice; or

Deny, revoke, suspend, or modify a license, charter, or certification pursuant to subdivision (a)(1)(A) and impose civil penalties pursuant to subdivision (a)(1)(B).

The commissioner shall send the person against whom a violation is alleged written notice setting forth the charges. The person shall have ten (10) days from the date the notice was sent to request a hearing. If a hearing is requested, it shall be conducted in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

A charter shall automatically be suspended should the licensed pest control operator whose name appears on the charter cease to be in charge of the charter holder's pest control operations. A grace period of no more than one hundred twenty (120) days may be granted to the charter holder so that another qualified person may be examined in accordance with this chapter.

Acts 1978, ch. 844, § 19; T.C.A., § 62-2119; Acts 1988, ch. 545, § 11; 2015, ch. 198, § 1.

Attorney General Opinions. The Commissioner of Agriculture must conduct a hearing, upon notice and without request, before any action may be taken against a charter, license, or certification, or any civil monetary penalty may be imposed; however, the commissioner may issue a warning notice without a hearing, OAG 00-189, 2000 Tenn. AG LEXIS 193 (12/20/00).

The Commissioner of Agriculture has authority to impose penalties at his discretion for any amount up to $1,000 for each violation of title 62, chapter 21 or title 43, chapter 8, parts 1 and 2, and the rules and regulations promulgated under these respective chapters, OAG 00-189, 2000 Tenn. AG LEXIS 193 (12/20/00).

62-21-120. Offense — Penalties — Limited term of ineligibility following conviction.

It is an offense for any person required by this chapter to be chartered or licensed to engage in commercial pest control activities to knowingly engage in commercial pest control activities without first obtaining the required charter or license.

Violation of subsection (a) is a Class A misdemeanor.

Each custom application of pesticides without the required charter or license constitutes a separate offense.

Persons convicted under subsection (a) are ineligible to obtain a charter or license to engage in commercial pest control activities for a period of one (1) year from the date of the person's conviction of the offense.

Acts 1978, ch. 844, § 20; T.C.A., § 62-2120; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 1994, ch. 960, § 13; 2001, ch. 105, § 3.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

62-21-121. Delinquent fees — Collection.

The fees and taxes imposed by this chapter shall become delinquent on the last day of each succeeding month.

The commissioner is empowered and may act to collect delinquent fees and taxes as provided by §§ 67-6-516 — 67-6-518.

Acts 1978, ch. 844, § 21; T.C.A., § 62-2121.

62-21-122. [Repealed.]

Acts 1978, ch. 844, § 22; T.C.A., § 62-2122; repealed by Acts 2020, ch. 640, § 8, effective April 1, 2020.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 62-21-122 concerned deposit of funds and operating expenses.

62-21-123. [Repealed.]

Acts 1978, ch. 844, § 23; T.C.A., § 62-2123; Acts 1989, ch. 360, § 12; repealed by Acts 2020, ch. 640, § 9, effective April 1, 2020.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 62-21-123 concerned expiration and renewals of charters and licenses.

62-21-124. Pesticides in buildings used for food preparation and service, lodging, educational purposes or commerical food processing.

Whether or not engaged in the business of applying pesticides, a person may not apply a pesticide within any of the following buildings, except under the direct supervision of a person licensed to apply pesticides in accordance with this chapter:

Any building used for the preparation or serving of food;

Any building used for the temporary or permanent lodging of others;

Any building used primarily for educational purposes, except those buildings used primarily for religious instruction or for providing education to no more than ten (10) persons; or

Any commercial food processing facility.

Subsection (a) does not apply to the application of pesticides by an individual in the individual's dwelling nor to the application of pesticides by the owner of a multi-unit dwelling in which the owner resides and that contains no more than three (3) additional units used for the temporary or permanent lodging of others.

Acts 1978, ch. 844, § 24; 1981, ch. 78, § 4; T.C.A., § 62-2124; Acts 1985, ch. 217, § 1; 1994, ch. 960, § 14.

62-21-125. [Repealed.]

Acts 1978, ch. 844, § 25; T.C.A., § 62-2125; repealed by Acts 2020, ch. 640, § 10, effective April 1, 2020.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 62-21-125 concerned rules and regulations promulgated under former statute.

62-21-126. [Repealed.]

Acts 1978, ch. 844, § 26; T.C.A., § 62-2126; repealed by Acts 2020, ch. 640, § 11, effective April 1, 2020.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 62-21-126 concerned licenses issued to pest control operators licensed under former statute.

62-21-127. [Repealed.]

Acts 1978, ch. 844, § 27; T.C.A., § 62-2127; repealed by Acts 2020, ch. 640, § 12, effective April 1, 2020.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 62-21-127 concerned rules and regulations subject to review.

62-21-128. Monthly report requirement — Exemption.

Notwithstanding any law, rule or regulation to the contrary, persons licensed in the category of wood destroying organisms shall not be required to file a monthly report to the department. A monthly report shall not be required to be filed whether any application of chemicals was made or not.

Acts 1991, ch. 441, § 6.

62-21-129. Local regulation of pesticides.

Except as provided in § 62-21-118(b) or § 43-8-115, no city, town, county or other political subdivision of this state shall adopt or continue in effect any ordinance, rule, regulation or statute regarding pesticide sale or use, including, but not limited to, registration, notification of use, advertising and marketing, distribution, applicator training and certification, storage, transportation, disposal, disclosure of confidential information or product composition.

This section shall not be construed to limit the authority of a city, town or county to zone for storage of such products or to provide or designate sites for disposal of such products, to regulate discharge to sanitary sewer system or to implement an approved pesticide management plan as may be required by the Safe Drinking Water Act (42 U.S.C. § 300f et seq.)

This section does not apply to any municipality having a population of not less than sixteen thousand five hundred (16,500) nor more than seventeen thousand five hundred (17,500), according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census.

Acts 1992, ch. 667, §§ 3, 5.

Compiler's Notes. For table of populations of Tennessee municipalities see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, § 10-7-504.

62-21-130. Assessment of investigation and hearing costs — Rules and regulations.

Notwithstanding any contrary law, the department or any division, board, commission or agency attached to the department may assess the actual and reasonable costs of the investigation, prosecution and hearing of any disciplinary action held in accordance with the contested case provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, part 3, in which sanctions of any kind are imposed on any person or entity required to be licensed, permitted, registered or otherwise authorized or regulated by the department or its respective divisions, boards, commissions or agencies. These costs may include, but are not limited to, those incurred and assessed for the time of the prosecuting attorneys, investigators, expert witnesses, administrative judges, court reporters and any other persons involved in the investigation, prosecution and hearing of the action.

All costs assessed pursuant to this section shall become final thirty (30) days after the date a final order of assessment is served.

If the individual or entity disciplined fails to pay an assessment when it becomes final, the department may apply to the appropriate court for a judgment and seek execution of the judgment.

Jurisdiction for recovery of costs shall be in the chancery court of Davidson County.

Acts 2001, ch. 105, § 4.

62-21-131. Surety bond for new charter in category 7.

A person, company or corporation applying for a new charter in category 7 shall furnish a surety bond in the amount of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) for the first three (3) years a person, company or corporation is in business. In the fourth year and subsequent years in business, the surety bond shall be ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per year. This section shall not apply to a person, company or corporation that, on July 1, 2005, has a current commercial pest control operator business charter as required by § 62-21-103.

Acts 2005, ch. 427, § 1.